Indiana, session 2026, HB1251.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-18-2-150, AS AMENDED BY P.L.197-2011,
SECTION 55, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 150. (a) "Governing body", for purposes of
IC 16-22-7, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-22-7-2.
(b) "Governing body", for purposes of IC 16-31-5, has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-31-5-0.5.
(b) (c) "Governing body", for purposes of IC 16-41-22, has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-41-22-3.
SECTION 2. IC 16-31-1-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The general
assembly declares that the provision of emergency medical services,
including emergency ambulance services, are essential services.
The provision of emergency medical services is a matter of vital
concern affecting the public health, safety, and welfare of the people of
Indiana.
(b) It is the purpose of this article:
(1) to promote the establishment and maintenance of an effective
EH 1251—LS 6944/DI 87


system of emergency medical service, including the necessary
equipment, personnel, and facilities to ensure that all emergency
patients receive prompt and adequate medical care throughout the
range of emergency conditions encountered;
(2) that the emergency medical services commission established
under IC 16-31-2 shall cooperate with other agencies empowered
to license persons engaged in the delivery of health care so as to
coordinate the efforts of the commission and other agencies; and
(3) to establish standards and requirements for the furnishing of
emergency medical services by persons not licensed or regulated
by other appropriate agencies.
SECTION 3. IC 16-31-1-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The provision of
Emergency medical service services, including emergency
ambulance services, are essential services. The provision of
emergency medical services is an essential purpose of the political
subdivisions of the state.
SECTION 4. IC 16-31-5-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. As used in this chapter, "governing body" means
the following:
(1) The board of county commissioners, for a county not
subject to IC 36-2-3.5 or IC 36-3-1.
(2) The county council, for a county subject to IC 36-2-3.5.
(3) The city-county council, for a consolidated city or county
having a consolidated city.
(4) The common council, for a city other than a consolidated
city.
(5) The town council, for a town.
(6) The township executive with the approval of the township
board, for a township.
SECTION 5. IC 16-31-5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.170-2022,
SECTION 30, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. Except as provided in section 1.5 of this
chapter, the governing body of a city, town, township, or county by the
governing body's action or in any combination may do the following:
(1) Establish, operate, and maintain emergency medical services.
(2) Levy taxes under and limited by IC 6-3.6 and expend
appropriated funds of the political subdivision to pay the costs
and expenses of establishing, operating, maintaining, or
contracting for emergency medical services.
(3) Except as provided in section 2 of this chapter, authorize,
EH 1251—LS 6944/DI 87


franchise, or contract for emergency medical services, including
entering into interlocal cooperation agreements under
IC 36-1-7. However:
(A) a county may not provide, authorize, or contract for
emergency medical services within the limits of any city
without the consent of the city; and
(B) a city or town may not provide, authorize, franchise, or
contract for emergency medical services outside the limits of
the city or town without the approval of the governing body of
the area to be served.
(4) Apply for, receive, and accept gifts, bequests, grants-in-aid,
state, federal, and local aid, and other forms of financial
assistance for the support of emergency medical services.
(5) Establish and provide for the collection of reasonable fees for
ambulance services the governing body provides under this
chapter.
(6) Pay the fees or dues for individual or group membership in
any regularly organized volunteer emergency medical services
association on their own behalf or on behalf of the emergency
medical services personnel serving that unit of government.
SECTION 6. IC 16-31-5-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) Subject to section 1(3) of this chapter, and
except as provided in subsection (c), a county governing body shall:
(1) identify areas of the county, if any, that are unserved by at
least one (1) public, private, or nonprofit provider of
emergency ambulance services; and
(2) provide emergency ambulance services to the unserved
areas by any of the means set forth in section 1 of this chapter,
including:
(A) establishing a county emergency ambulance service;
(B) contracting with a public, private, or nonprofit
provider of emergency ambulance services; or
(C) entering into interlocal cooperation agreements under
IC 36-1-7 with one (1) or more political subdivisions.
(b) Nothing in this section requires the county to appropriate
county revenue to provide emergency ambulance services, if
emergency ambulance services can be provided by other means.
(c) A governing body may pass an ordinance to opt out of the
requirements set forth in subsection (a) if, after making every
reasonable effort to comply with the requirements set forth in
subsection (a), the governing body determines that it is unable to
EH 1251—LS 6944/DI 87


comply with the requirements. The ordinance shall state the
specific reasons for noncompliance. The county shall send a copy
of the ordinance to the department of homeland security.
(d) If a governing body opts out of the requirements set forth in
subsection (a), the county, the governing body, and the individual
governing body members are immune from civil liability for
personal injury or death resulting from an area of the county being
unserved by emergency ambulance services.
SECTION 7. IC 34-30-2.1-209.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 209.5. IC 16-31-5-1.5 (Concerning
a county that opts out of providing emergency ambulance services).
EH 1251—LS 6944/DI 87


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Veterans Affairs and Public
Safety, to which was referred House Bill 1251, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the House with
the recommendation that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1251 as introduced.)
BARTELS
Committee Vote: Yeas 12, Nays 0
_____
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Ways and Means, to which was
referred House Bill 1251, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the House with the
recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 3, line 23, after "chapter," insert "and except as provided in
subsection (c),".
Page 3, after line 38, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(c) A governing body may pass an ordinance to opt out of the
requirements set forth in subsection (a) if, after making every
reasonable effort to comply with the requirements set forth in
subsection (a), the governing body determines that it is unable to
comply with the requirements. The ordinance shall state the
specific reasons for noncompliance. The county shall send a copy
of the ordinance to the department of homeland security.".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1251 as printed January 12, 2026.)
THOMPSON
Committee Vote: yeas 23, nays 0.
EH 1251—LS 6944/DI 87


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Local Government, to
which was referred House Bill No. 1251, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 4, after line 3, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(d) If a governing body opts out of the requirements set forth
in subsection (a), the county, the governing body, and the
individual governing body members are immune from civil liability
for personal injury or death resulting from an area of the county
being unserved by emergency ambulance services.
SECTION 7. IC 34-30-2.1-209.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 209.5. IC 16-31-5-1.5 (Concerning
a county that opts out of providing emergency ambulance
services).".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass and be reassigned to the
Senate Committee on Tax and Fiscal Policy.
(Reference is to HB 1251 as printed January 27, 2026.)
BUCK, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 10, Nays 0.
EH 1251—LS 6944/DI 87